California statutes. Labor Code
(a) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association, and includes, but is not limited to, employers, manufacturers, jobbers, wholesalers, contractors, subcontractors, and any other person or entity engaged in the business of garment manufacturing.

“Person” does not include any person who manufactures garments by oneself, without the assistance of a contractor, employee, or others; any person who engages solely in that part of the business engaged solely in cleaning, alteration, or tailoring; any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee with wages as their sole compensation; or any person as provided by regulation.

(b) “Garment manufacturer” or “manufacturer” means any person who is engaged in garment manufacturing who is not a contractor.

(c) “Garment manufacturing” means sewing, cutting, making, processing, repairing, finishing, assembling, dyeing, altering a garment’s design, causing another person to alter a garment’s design, affixing a label to a garment, or otherwise preparing any garment or any article of wearing apparel or accessories designed or intended to be worn by any individual, including, but not limited to, clothing, hats, gloves, handbags, hosiery, ties, scarfs, and belts, for sale or resale by any person or any persons contracting to have those operations performed and other operations and practices in the apparel industry as may be identified in regulations of the Department of Industrial Relations consistent with the purposes of this part. The Labor Commissioner shall adopt,
 and may from time to time amend, regulations to clarify and refine this definition to be consistent with current and future industry practices, but the regulations shall not limit the scope of garment manufacturing, as defined in this subdivision. The definition in this subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(d) “Brand guarantor” means any person contracting for the performance of garment manufacturing, regardless of whether the person with whom they contract performs the manufacturing operations or hires contractors or subcontractors to perform the manufacturing operations, which include sewing, cutting, making, processing, repairing, finishing, assembling, dyeing, altering a garment’s design, causing another person to alter a garment’s design, affixing a label on a garment, or otherwise preparing any garment or any article of wearing apparel or accessories designed or intended to be worn by any individual, including, but not limited to,
 clothing, hats, gloves, handbags, hosiery, ties, scarfs, and belts, for sale or resale and other operations and practices in the apparel industry as may be identified in regulations of the Department of Industrial Relations consistent with the purposes of this part. Contracts for the performance of garment manufacturing include licensing of a brand or name. The Labor Commissioner may adopt, and may from time to time amend, regulations to clarify and refine this definition to be consistent with current and future industry practices; however, the regulations shall not limit the scope of garment manufacturing, as defined in this section.

(e) “Commissioner” means the Labor Commissioner.

(f) “Contractor” means any person who, with the assistance of employees or others, is engaged in garment manufacturing by primarily engaging in sewing, cutting, making, processing, repairing,
 finishing, assembling, dyeing, altering a garment’s design, causing another person to alter a garment’s design, affixing a label on a garment, or otherwise preparing any garment or any article of wearing apparel or accessories designed or intended to be worn by any individual, including, but not limited to, clothing, hats, gloves, handbags, hosiery, ties, scarfs, and belts, for another person, including, but not limited to, another contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor. “Contractor” includes a subcontractor that is primarily engaged in those operations. The Labor Commissioner may adopt, and may from time to time amend, regulations to clarify and refine this definition to be consistent with current and future industry practices; however, the regulations shall not limit the scope of garment manufacturing, as defined in this section. The definition in this subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 140.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2672.

The commissioner shall promulgate all regulations and rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this part. The commissioner, upon good cause, may impose, in his or her discretion, the terms of penalties, the revocation of registrations, and the confiscation or disposal of goods in accordance with such rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2673.

(a) Every employer engaged in the business of garment manufacturing shall keep accurate records for four years which show all of the following:

(1) The names and addresses of all garment workers directly employed by such person.

(2) The hours worked daily by employees, including the times the employees begin and end each work period.

(3) The daily production sheets, including piece rates.

(4) The wage and wage rates paid each payroll period.

(5) The contract worksheets
 indicating the price per unit agreed to between the contractor and manufacturer.

(6) All contracts, invoices, purchase orders, work or job orders, and style or cut sheets. This documentation shall include the business names, addresses, and contact information of the contracting parties.

(7) A copy of the garment license of every person engaged in garment manufacturing who is required to register with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 2675, and with whom the employer has entered into a contract for the performance of garment manufacturing. 

(8) The ages of all minor employees.

(9) Any other conditions of employment.

(b) Brand guarantors shall keep accurate records for four years
 that show all of the following:

(1) Contract worksheets indicating the price per unit agreed to between the brand guarantor and the contractor or manufacturer.

(2) All contracts, invoices, purchase orders, work or job orders, and style or cut sheets. This documentation shall include the business names, addresses, and contract information of the contracting parties.

(3) A copy of the garment license of every person engaged in garment manufacturing who is required to register with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 2675, and with whom the employer has entered into a contract for the performance of garment manufacturing.

(c) The recordkeeping requirements in this section are in addition to the recordkeeping requirements set forth in this code, the
 California Code of Regulations, and in the Industrial Welfare Commission wage orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 329, Sec. 5.   (SB 62)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2673.1.

(a) (1) To ensure that employees are paid for all hours worked, a garment manufacturer, contractor, or brand guarantor, who contracts with another person for the performance of garment manufacturing operations, shall be jointly and severally liable with any manufacturer and contractor who performs those operations for the garment manufacturer or brand guarantor, for all of the following:

(A) The full amount of unpaid minimum, regular, overtime, and other premium wages, reimbursement for expenses, and any other compensation, including interest, due to any and all employees who performed the manufacturing operations for any violation of this code.

(B) The employee’s reasonable attorney’s fees and costs pursuant to subdivision (e).

(C) Civil penalties for
 the failure to secure valid workers’ compensation coverage as required by Section 3700.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent or prohibit two or more parties, who are held jointly and severally liable under this section after a final judgment is rendered by the court, from establishing, exercising, or enforcing, by contract or otherwise, any lawful or equitable remedies, including, but not limited to, a right of contribution and indemnity against each other for liability created by acts of the other.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prevent, prohibit, or limit the liability of garment manufacturers or contractors for damages and penalties owed to an employee due to violations of this section.

(b) In addition to the liability imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), garment manufacturers and contractors shall be
 liable for the full amount of damages and penalties, including interest, due to any and all employees, for a violation of this code. Damages shall include liquidated damages in an amount equal to the wages unlawfully withheld, as set forth in Section 1194.2, and liquidated damages in an amount equal to unpaid overtime compensation due. If two or more persons are performing work at the same worksite, during the same payroll period, the liability of each person shall be limited to their proportionate share, as determined by the Labor Commissioner, pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (d).

(c) Employees may enforce this section solely by filing a claim with the Labor Commissioner against the contractor, the garment manufacturer, and the brand guarantor, if known, to recover unpaid wages and associated penalties. Garment manufacturers and brand guarantors whose identity or existence is unknown at the time the claim is filed may be added
 to the claim pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(d) Claims filed with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the following procedure:

(1) Within 10 business days of receiving a claim pursuant to subdivision (c), the Labor Commissioner shall give written notice to the employee, the contractor, and the identified manufacturer and brand guarantors of the nature of the claim and the date of the meet-and-confer conference on the claim. Within 10 business days of receiving the claim, the Labor Commissioner shall issue a subpoena duces tecum requiring the contractor and any identified manufacturer and brand guarantor to submit to the Labor Commissioner those books and records as may be necessary to investigate the claim and determine the identity of any potential manufacturers and brand guarantors for the payment of the wage claim, including,
 but not limited to, invoices for work performed by any and all persons during the period included in the claim. Compliance with a request for books and records, within 10 days of the mailing of the notice, shall be a condition of continued registration pursuant to Section 2675. At the request of any party, the Labor Commissioner shall provide to that party copies of all books and records received by the Labor Commissioner in conducting its investigation.

(2) Within 30 days of receiving a claim pursuant to subdivision (c), the Labor Commissioner shall send a notice of the claim and of the meet-and-confer conference to any other person who may be a manufacturer or brand guarantor with respect to the claim.

(3) Within 60 days of receiving a claim pursuant to subdivision (c), the Labor Commissioner shall hold a meet-and-confer conference with the employee, the contractor, and all
 identified manufacturers and brand guarantors to attempt to resolve the claim. Prior to the meet-and-confer conference, the Labor Commissioner shall conduct and complete an investigation of the claim, shall make an assessment of the amount of wages, damages, penalties, expenses, and other compensation owed, and shall conduct an investigation and determine liability pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). At that same time, the Labor Commissioner shall also investigate and determine the proportionate liability pursuant to subdivision (b). The investigation shall include, but not be limited to, interviewing the employee and their witnesses and making an assessment of the amounts due, if any, to the employee. If an employee provides the Labor Commissioner with labels, or the equivalent thereto, from a brand guarantor or garment manufacturer, or other information that the commissioner finds credible relating to the identity of any brand guarantor or garment manufacturer for whom the employee performed garment
 manufacturing operations, there shall be a presumption that the brand guarantor or garment manufacturer is liable with the contractor for any amounts found to be due to the employee, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). An employee’s claim of hours worked, and wages, damages, penalties, expenses, and other compensation due, including the claim of liability of a brand guarantor or garment manufacturer upon provision by the employee of labels or other credible information about work performed for any person, shall be presumed valid and shall be the Labor Commissioner’s assessment, unless the brand guarantor, garment manufacturer, or contractor provides specific, compelling, and reliable written evidence to the contrary. That evidence from the brand guarantor, garment manufacturer, or contractor shall include accurate, complete, and contemporaneous records pursuant to Sections 226, 1174, and 2673, and the industrial commission wage order, including, but not limited to, itemized wage deduction
 statements, bona fide complete and accurate payroll records, evidence of the precise hours worked by the employee for each pay period during the period of the claim, and evidence, including a purchase order or invoice identifying the person or persons for whom garment manufacturing operations were performed. In the absence of the provision of that evidence, or the failure to timely respond to a subpoena pursuant to paragraph (1), a written declaration from a brand guarantor, garment manufacturer, or contractor is not sufficient to rebut the presumption of validity of the worker’s claim and liability of the respective parties. If the Labor Commissioner finds falsification by the garment manufacturer or contractor of payroll records submitted for any pay period of the claim, any other payroll records submitted by the garment manufacturer or contractor shall be presumed false and disregarded.

The Labor Commissioner shall present their assessment of the amount of wages,
 and each contractor’s or each garment manufacturer’s proportionate shares of damages and penalties, owed to the parties at the meet-and-confer conference and shall make a demand for payment of the amount of the assessment. If no resolution is reached, the Labor Commissioner shall, at the meet-and-confer conference, set the matter for hearing pursuant to paragraph (4).

(4) The hearing shall commence within 30 days of, and shall be completed within 45 days of, the date of the meet-and-confer conference. The hearing may be bifurcated, addressing first the question of wages and other compensation owed, as well as liability of the garment manufacturers, brand guarantors, and contractors, and, immediately thereafter, the proportionate responsibility of the damages and penalties for which each contractor or garment manufacturer is liable, pursuant to subdivision (c). The Labor Commissioner shall present their findings and assessments at the hearing.
 Any party may present evidence at the hearing to support or rebut the proposed findings and assessments. If an employee has provided the Labor Commissioner with labels, or the equivalent thereto, from a brand guarantor or garment manufacturer, or provides other information or testimony that the Labor Commissioner finds credible relating to the identity of any brand guarantor or garment manufacturer, for whom the employee performed garment manufacturing operations, there shall be a presumption that the brand guarantor or garment manufacturer is liable with the contractor for any amounts found to be due to the employee, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). A written declaration or testimony from a brand guarantor, garment manufacturer, or contractor is not sufficient to rebut the presumption of liability of the respective parties. If the Labor Commissioner finds falsification by the garment manufacturer or contractor of payroll records submitted for any pay period of the claim, any other payroll
 records submitted by the garment manufacturer or contractor shall be presumed false and disregarded. Except as provided in this paragraph, the hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedure set forth in subdivisions (b) to (h), inclusive, of Section 98. It is the intent of the Legislature that these hearings be conducted in an informal setting preserving the rights of the parties.

(5) Within 15 days of the completion of the hearing, the Labor Commissioner shall issue an order, decision, or award with respect to the claim and shall file the order, decision, or award in accordance with Section 98.1.

(e) If either the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor refuses to pay the assessment, and the employee prevails at the hearing, the party that refuses to pay shall pay the employee’s reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. If the employee rejects the assessment of
 the Labor Commissioner and prevails at the hearing, the contractor shall pay the employee’s reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The garment manufacturer and brand guarantor shall be jointly and severally liable with the contractor for the attorney’s fees and costs awarded to an employee.

(f) Any party shall have the right to judicial review of the order, decision, or award of the Labor Commissioner made pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) as provided in Section 98.2. As a condition precedent to filing an appeal, the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor, whichever appeals, shall post a bond with the Labor Commissioner in an amount equal to one and one-half times the amount of the award. No bond shall be required of an employee filing an appeal pursuant to Section 98.2. At the employee’s request, the Labor Commissioner shall represent the employee in the judicial review as provided in Section 98.4.

(g) If the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor appeals the order, decision, or award of the Labor Commissioner and the employee prevails on appeal, the court shall order the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor, as the case may be, to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of the employee incurred in pursuing their claim. If the employee appeals the order, decision, or award of the Labor Commissioner and the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor prevails on appeal, the court may order the employee to pay the reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of the contractor, garment manufacturer, or brand guarantor only if the court determines that the employee acted in bad faith in bringing the claim.

(h) The rights and remedies provided by this section do not preclude an employee from pursuing any other rights and remedies under any other
 provision of state or federal law. If a finding and assessment is not issued as specified and within the time limits in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), the employee may bring a civil action for the recovery of unpaid wages pursuant to any other rights and remedies under any other provision of the laws of this state unless, prior to the employee bringing the civil action, the garment manufacturer or brand guarantor files a petition for writ of mandate within 10 days of the date the assessment should have been issued. If findings and assessments are not made, or a hearing is not commenced or an order, decision, or award is not issued within the time limits specified in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (d), any party may file a petition for writ of mandate to compel the Labor Commissioner to issue findings and assessments, commence the hearing, or issue the order, decision, or award. All time requirements specified in this section shall be mandatory and shall be enforceable by a writ of mandate.

(i) The Labor Commissioner may enforce the joint and several liability of a garment manufacturer or brand guarantor described in this section in the same manner as a proceeding against the contractor. The Labor Commissioner may, with or without a complaint being filed by an employee, conduct an investigation as to whether all the employees of persons engaged in garment manufacturing are being paid all minimum, regular, overtime, and other premium wages, reimbursement for expenses, any other compensation, damages, and penalties due and, with or without the consent of the employees affected, commence a civil action to enforce joint and several liability described in this section. Prior to commencing such a civil action and pursuant to rules of practice and procedure adopted by the Labor Commissioner, the commissioner shall provide notice of the investigation to the garment manufacturer or brand guarantor and the employee, issue findings and an
 assessment of the amount of wages due, hold a meet-and-confer conference with the parties to attempt to resolve the matter, and provide for a hearing.

(j) Except as expressly provided in this section, this section shall not be deemed to create any new right to bring a civil action of any kind for unpaid minimum, regular, overtime, and other premium wages, reimbursement for expenses, any other compensation, damages, penalties, attorney’s fees, or costs against a brand guarantor, garment manufacturer, or contractor.

(k) The payment of the wages provided in this section shall not be used as a basis for finding that the brand guarantor or registered garment manufacturer making the payment is a joint employer, coemployer, or single employer of any employees of a contractor that is also a registered garment manufacturer.

(l) The Labor Commissioner may, in their discretion, revoke, deny, or suspend the registration under this part of any registrant that fails to pay, on a timely basis, any wages awarded pursuant to this section, after the award has become final. This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(m) The Labor Commissioner may also enforce this section by issuing stop orders or citations. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations issued by the Labor Commissioner under this section shall be the same as those set forth in subdivisions (b) to (k), inclusive, of Section 1197.1.

(n) Any statutory damages or penalties recovered or assessed in an action brought under this section shall be payable to the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 39.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2673.2.

(a) To ensure that employees are paid for all hours worked, an employee engaged in the performance of garment manufacturing shall not be paid by the piece or unit, or by the piece rate. Employees engaged in the performance of garment manufacturing shall be paid at an hourly rate not less than the applicable minimum wage.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit incentive-based bonuses.

(c) This section shall not apply to workplaces where employees are covered by a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, if the agreement expressly provides for wages, hours of work, and working conditions of the employees; premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked and a
 regular hourly rate of pay for those employees of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage; stewards or monitors; and a process to resolve disputes concerning nonpayment of wages.

(d) In addition to, and entirely independent and apart from, any other damages or penalties provided in this code, any garment manufacturer or contractor who violates subdivision (a) shall be subject to compensatory damages of two hundred dollars ($200) per employee for each pay period in which each employee is paid by the piece rate.

(e) This section may be enforced solely by filing a claim with the Labor Commissioner against the contractor or garment manufacturer, if known. Garment manufacturers or contractors whose identity or existence is unknown at the time that the claim is filed may be added to the claim pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 2673.1.

(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Labor Commissioner may also bring an action to enforce this section under Section 98.3 or issue a citation against the garment manufacturer or contractors who violate this section. Those garment manufacturers or contractors shall be subject to compensatory damages of two hundred dollars ($200) per employee paid by the piece rate per pay period. The procedure for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations issued by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be the same as those set forth in subdivisions (b) to (l), inclusive, of Section 1197.1.

(g) Any statutory damages or penalties recovered or assessed in an action brought under, or a citation issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to, this section or Section 98.3, shall be payable to the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 329, Sec. 7.   (SB 62)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2674.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall enforce Section 2673 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2675).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2674.1.

The commissioner shall appoint an advisory committee on garment manufacturing to advise him or her of common industry problems and to effect liaison between his or her office and various segments of the industry. The committee shall consist of a cross section of the industry and shall include representatives of unions, employees, contractor associations, jobbers, and manufacturers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2674.2.

In the annual budget submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, the Governor shall include a detailed statement of the cost of regulation and estimated revenues pursuant to the provisions of this part. The Legislature intends that the fees established and other revenue received pursuant to this part shall provide sufficient funds to meet all state costs incurred pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Registration [2675. - 2684.]

2675.

(a) For purposes of enforcing this part and Sections 204, 209, 212, 221, 222, 222.5, 223, 226, 227, and 227.5, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 300) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 400) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of this division, Sections 1195.5, 1197, 1197.5, and 1198, Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200), every person engaged in the business of garment manufacturing, shall register with the commissioner.

The commissioner shall not permit any person to register, nor shall the commissioner allow any person to renew registration, until all the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person has executed a written application therefor in a form prescribed by the commissioner, subscribed and sworn by the person, and containing:

(A) A statement by the person of all facts required by the commissioner concerning the applicant’s character, competency, responsibility, and the manner and method by which the person proposes to engage in the business of garment manufacturing if the registration is issued.

(B) The names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested, either as partners, associates, or profit sharers, in the proposed business of garment manufacturing together with the amount of their respective interests, except that in the case of a publicly traded corporation a listing of principal officers shall suffice.

(2) The commissioner, after investigation, is satisfied as to the character, competency, and responsibility of the person.

(3) In the case of a person who has been cited and penalized within the prior three years under this part, the person has deposited or has on file a surety bond in the sum and form that the commissioner deems sufficient and adequate to ensure future compliance, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond shall be payable to the people of California and shall be for the benefit of any employee of a registrant damaged by the registrant’s failure to pay wages and fringe benefits, or for the benefit of any employee of a registrant damaged by a violation of Section 2677.5.

(4) The person has documented that a current workers’ compensation insurance policy is in effect for the employees of the person seeking registration.

(5) The person has paid an initial or renewal registration fee to the commissioner. The fee for initial registration and for each registration renewal shall be established in an amount determined by the Labor Commissioner to be sufficient to defray the costs of administering this part and shall be based on the applicant’s annual volume, but shall be not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and shall be not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for contractors and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for all other registrants.

(b) At the time a certificate of registration is originally issued or renewed, the commissioner shall provide related and supplemental information regarding business administration and applicable labor laws. This related and supplemental information, as much as reasonably possible, shall be provided in the primary language of the garment manufacturer. The information shall include all subject matter on which persons seeking registration are examined pursuant to subdivision (c), and shall be available to persons seeking registration prior to taking this examination.

(c) Effective January 1, 1991, persons seeking registration under this section for the first time, and persons seeking to renew their registration pursuant to subdivision (f), shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Demonstrate, by an oral or written examination, or both, knowledge of the pertinent laws and administrative regulations concerning garment manufacturing as the commissioner deems necessary for the safety and protection of garment workers.

(2) Demonstrate, by an oral or written examination, or both, knowledge of state laws and regulations relating to occupational safety and health which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Section 3203 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations (Injury Prevention Program).

(B) Section 3220 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations (Emergency Action Plan).

(C) Section 3221 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations (Fire Prevention Plan).

(D) Section 6151 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations which provides for the placement, use, maintenance, and testing of portable fire extinguishers provided for the use of employees.

(3) Sign a statement which provides that he or she shall do all of the following:

(A) Comply with those regulations specified in paragraph (2) which establish minimum standards for securing safety in all places of employment.

(B) Ensure that all employees are made aware of the existence of these regulations and any other applicable laws and are instructed in how to implement the Injury Prevention Program, Emergency Action Plan, and Fire Prevention Plan, specified in paragraph (2), in the workplace.

(C) Ensure that all employees are instructed in the use of portable fire extinguishers.

(D) Post the Injury Prevention Program, Emergency Action Plan, and Fire Prevention Plan, specified in paragraph (2), in a prominent location in the workplace.

(d) The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall assist the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in developing the examination which shall include, but not be limited to, the state’s occupational safety and health laws specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) The commissioner shall charge a fee to persons taking the examinations required by subdivision (c) which is sufficient to pay for costs incurred in administering the examinations.

(f) A person seeking renewal of registration shall be required to take both of the examinations, and sign the statement, specified in subdivision (c). However, once a renewal of registration has been granted based on these examinations, subsequent examinations shall only be required at the discretion of the commissioner if, in the preceding year, the registrant has been found to be in violation of subdivision (a) or any of the sections enumerated in that subdivision.

(g) Proof of registration shall be by an official Division of Labor Standards Enforcement registration form. Every person, as set forth in Section 2671, shall post the registration form where it may be read by employees during the workday.

(h) At least 90 days prior to the expiration of each registrant’s registration, the commissioner shall mail a renewal notice to the last known address of the registrant. The notice shall include all necessary application forms and complete instructions for registration renewal. However, omission of the commissioner to provide notice in accordance with this subdivision shall not excuse a registrant from making timely application for renewal of registration, shall not be a defense in any action or proceeding involving failure to renew registration, and shall not subject the commissioner to any legal liability under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2675.2.

Whenever an application for renewal of registration is received by the Labor Commissioner 30 days prior to the expiration of the registration, and the Labor Commissioner cannot process the application before the expiration date, the Labor Commissioner may extend the registration for no more than 90 days if the applicant has submitted a complete application, owes no outstanding penalties, owes no back wages, meets all applicable bonding requirements, and meets all other requirements for registration. Upon a showing of extenuating circumstances, the Labor Commissioner may provide such an extension with respect to a renewal application not received 30 or more days prior to expiration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2675.5.

(a) The commissioner shall deposit seventy-five dollars ($75) of each registrant’s annual registration fee, required pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2675, into one separate account. Funds from the separate account shall be disbursed by the commissioner only to persons determined by the commissioner to have been damaged by the failure to pay wages and benefits by any garment manufacturer, brand guarantor, or contractor.

(1) In making these determinations, the Labor Commissioner shall disburse amounts from the fund to ensure the payment of wages and benefits, interest, and any damages or other monetary relief arising from the violation of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission or from a violation of this code, including statutory
 penalties recoverable by an employee, determined to be due to a garment worker by a registered or unregistered garment business.

(2) A disbursement shall be made pursuant to a claim for recovery from the fund in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Labor Commissioner.

(3) Any disbursed funds subsequently recovered by the Labor Commissioner, pursuant to an assignment of the claim to the commissioner for recovery, including recovery from a surety under a bond pursuant to Section 2675, or otherwise recovered by the Labor Commissioner from a liable party, shall be returned to the separate account.

(b) The remainder of each registrant’s annual registration fee not deposited into the special account pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in a subaccount and applied to costs incurred by the commissioner in
 administering the provisions of Section 2673.1, Section 2675, and this section, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 40.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.

Any person engaged in the business of garment manufacturing who is not registered is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 2678.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 276, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.5.

(a) Every person registered as a garment manufacturer shall display on the front entrance of his or her business premise, and also, if the front entrance is within the interior of a building, on or near the main exterior entrance of the building in which his or her business premise is located, his or her name, address, and garment manufacturing registration number, all in letters not less than three inches high.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may waive the requirements of this section if he or she finds compliance to be unfeasible due to the design or layout of a business premise.

(c) This section shall not apply to a showroom or a building containing a showroom if no garment manufacturing or only incidental garment manufacturing is conducted in the showroom or the building.

(d) As used in this section, “showroom” means a room where merchandise is exposed for sale or where samples are displayed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.55.

(a) Any person who fails to comply with Section 2676.5 shall be subject to a civil penalty, for which a citation may be issued as follows:

(1) For an initial citation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day that the person engages or has engaged in garment manufacturing, as defined in Section 2671, without complying with Section 2676.5.

(2) For any subsequent citation, two hundred dollars ($200) for each calendar day that the person engages or has engaged in garment manufacturing, as defined in Section 2671, without complying with Section 2676.5.

(b) If, upon
 inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that a person has violated Section 2676.5, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation to the person in violation. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations or civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner for a violation of Section 2676.5 shall be the same as those set out in Section 2681.

(c) The civil penalties provided for in this section are in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2676.7.

Any local agency which issues business licenses or permits shall require, as a condition of issuing any business license or permit for a garment manufacturing business, proof that the person applying for the license or permit is registered pursuant to this chapter. The official Division of Labor Standards Enforcement registration form issued pursuant to Section 2675 shall constitute proof of registration.

A person may apply for a business license or permit prior to registration with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 172, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2677.
